Connecticut, session 2026, SB00122.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective from passage) The Commissioner of Social Services,
2 in consultation with the Commissioner of Aging and Disability Services,
3 shall conduct a study of the state's long-term care needs. Not later than
4 January 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Social Services shall report the
5 results of the study, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a
6 of the general statutes, to the joint standing committees of the General
7 Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to aging and human
8 services.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
AGE Joint Favorable
SB122 / File No. 45 1

SB122 File No. 45
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which requires the Department of Social Services to conduct
a study of the state's long-term care needs in consultation with the
Department of Aging and Disability Services, has no fiscal impact as the
agencies have the expertise necessary to meet the provisions of the bill.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
SB122 / File No. 45 2

SB122 File No. 45
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 122
AN ACT CONCERNING A STUDY OF LONG-TERM CARE NEEDS.